Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 3

Tennessee Sports Gaming Act

4-51-301. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Sports Gaming Act.”

Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 7 provided that the act take effect July 1, 2019, the public welfare requiring it. The act was returned without the governor's signature and became effective under the provisions of Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18.

4-51-302. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Adjusted gross income” means the total of all money paid to a licensee as bets minus the total amount paid out to winning bettors over a specified period of time, which includes the cash equivalent of any merchandise or thing of value awarded as a prize;

“Bettor” means a person who is:

Twenty-one (21) years of age or older;

Physically present in this state when placing a wager with a licensee; and

Not prohibited from placing a wager under § 4-51-312;

“Bond” means a bond held in escrow for the purpose of maintaining adequate reserves to account for losses suffered by a licensee and owed to bettors;

“Cheating” means improving the chances of winning or of altering the outcome by deception, interference, or manipulation of a sporting event or of any equipment, including software pertaining to or used in relation to the equipment, used for or in connection with the sporting event on which wagers are placed or are invited, including attempts and conspiracy to cheat;

“Collegiate” means belonging to, or involving, a public or private institution of higher education;

“Collegiate sporting event” means a sporting or athletics event involving a sports or athletics team of a public or private institution of higher education;

“Council” means the Tennessee education lottery corporation sports wagering advisory council;

“E-sport” means any multiplayer video game played competitively for spectators, either in-person or via remote connection, in which success principally depends upon the superior knowledge, training, experience, and adroitness of the players;

“Fixed-odds betting” means bets made at predetermined odds or on the spread where the return to the bettor is unaffected by any later change in odds or the spread;

“Future bet” means a wager made on the occurrence of an event in the future relating to a sporting event;

“Interactive sports wagering” means placing a wager on a sporting event via the internet, a mobile device, or other telecommunications platform;

“License” means a license to accept wagers from bettors on sporting events issued under § 4-51-317;

“Licensee” means a person who holds a license issued under § 4-51-317;

“Live betting” means a type of wager that is placed after the sporting event being wagered on has commenced and whose odds on events occurring are adjusted in real time;

“Minor” means a person who is less than twenty-one (21) years of age;

“Money line” means the fixed odds in relation to a dollar amount that a team or person participating in a sporting event will win outright, regardless of the spread;

“Official league data” means statistics, results, outcomes, and other data related to a sporting event obtained pursuant to an agreement with the relevant governing body of a sport or sports league, organization, or association whose corporate headquarters are based in the United States, or an entity expressly authorized by such governing body to provide such information to licensees for purposes of live betting;

“Online sports wagering platform” means the combination of hardware, software, and data networks used to manage, administer, or control sports wagering and any associated wagers accessible by any electronic means, including mobile applications and internet websites accessed via a mobile device or computer;

“Pari-mutuel betting” means a type of bet in which all wagers on a particular occurrence are pooled and winnings are paid in accordance with the size of the pool and the number of winners;

“Parlay bet” means a single wager that incorporates two (2) or more individual bets for purposes of earning a higher payout if each bet incorporated within the wager wins;

“Professional sports team” means a major or minor league professional baseball, football, basketball, soccer, or hockey franchise, or a professional motor sport;

“Proposition bet” means a wager made regarding the occurrence or nonoccurrence during a sporting event of an event that does not directly affect the final outcome of the sporting event;

“Sporting event” means any professional sporting or athletic event, including motorsports and e-sports, any collegiate sporting or athletic event, or any Olympic sporting or athletic event sanctioned by a national or international organization or association. “Sporting event” does not include horse racing;

“Sports governing body” means the organization, league, or association that oversees a sport and prescribes final rules and enforces codes of conduct with respect to such sport and participants therein;

“Spread” means the predicted scoring differential between two (2) persons or teams engaged in a sporting event;

“Supervisory employee” means a principal or employee having the authority to act on behalf of a licensee or whose judgment is being relied upon to manage and advance the business operations of a licensee;

“Vendor” means a contractor, subcontractor, or independent contractor hired, or contracted with, by the corporation or a licensee for the purpose of facilitating the business of the corporation or licensee under this part. “Vendor” does not include a lottery system vendor as that term is used under part 1 of this chapter; and

“Wager” or “bet” means a sum of money that is risked by a bettor on the unknown outcome of one (1) or more sporting events, including, but not limited to, the form of fixed-odds betting, a future bet, live betting, a money line bet, pari-mutuel betting, parlay bet, pools, proposition bet, spread bet, or in any other form or manner as authorized by rule of the board.

Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 7 provided that the act take effect July 1, 2019, the public welfare requiring it. The act was returned without the governor's signature and became effective under the provisions of Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18.

4-51-303. Restrictions on and regulation of licenses.

A person issued a license to offer interactive sports wagering under this part is subject to all provisions of this part relating to licensure, regulation, and civil and criminal penalties.

Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 7 provided that the act take effect July 1, 2019, the public welfare requiring it. The act was returned without the governor's signature and became effective under the provisions of Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18.

4-51-304. Taxes — Collection — Disposition of taxes.

It is a taxable privilege to offer sports wagering in this state under a license issued in accordance with this part. Notwithstanding any state law to the contrary, a licensee shall only pay a privilege tax on its adjusted gross income in accordance with this section.

There is imposed upon the adjusted gross income of a licensee a privilege tax of twenty percent (20%).

The tax imposed under this section must be paid monthly by a licensee based on its monthly adjusted gross income for the immediately preceding calendar month. The tax must be paid to the corporation in accordance with rules promulgated by the corporation.

For the purpose of enforcing this part and ascertaining the amount of tax due under this section, the corporation may competitively procure the services of a vendor to provide a central accounting and reporting system, to ascertain all bets wagered minus the total amount paid out to winning bettors daily, and such other information as the corporation may require. All licensees shall utilize such central accounting and reporting system.

Eighty percent (80%) of the privilege tax collected under this section must be distributed by the corporation to the state treasurer for deposit into the lottery for education account created under § 4-51-111. Funds deposited under this subdivision (e)(1) must be accounted for separately by the corporation from funds collected by the corporation for the lottery. Section 4-51-111 is otherwise inapplicable to taxes collected and deposited under this subdivision (e)(1).

Notwithstanding § 4-51-111, fifteen percent (15%) of the privilege tax collected under this section must be distributed by the corporation quarterly to the state treasurer for deposit into the general fund, to be remitted quarterly to each local government in this state on a per capita basis, as determined by population based on the last federal census. For purposes of calculating the allocation, the population of counties excludes the population of each municipality within the boundaries of the county. Funds remitted to a local government under this subdivision (e)(2) must be allocated to the county or city general fund, as applicable, to be used for local infrastructure projects, including, without limitation, transportation and road projects and public buildings.

Notwithstanding § 4-51-111, five percent (5%) of the privilege tax collected under this section must be distributed by the corporation to the state treasurer and allocated to the department of mental health and substance abuse services to use in the manner prescribed by § 4-51-319.

Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 7 provided that the act take effect July 1, 2019, the public welfare requiring it. The act was returned without the governor's signature and became effective under the provisions of Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18.

4-51-305. Lottery corporation sports wagering advisory council — Creation — Membership — Terms.

There is created a lottery corporation sports wagering advisory council to assist the corporation with sports wagering activities.

The council is composed of nine (9) members appointed as follows:

Three (3) by the governor, with one (1) member from each grand division of this state;

Three (3) by the speaker of the senate, with one (1) member from each grand division of this state; and

Three (3) by the speaker of the house of representatives, with one (1) member from each grand division of this state.

Prior to the appointment of a person to the council, the appointing authority shall submit the name of the potential member to the Tennessee bureau of investigation. The bureau shall conduct a criminal records check on all such persons pursuant to § 38-6-109. The bureau may contract with any other law enforcement agency to assist in such investigation. Such potential member shall supply a set of fingerprints upon request and in the manner requested by the investigating entity.

The term of each member begins on July 1. For purposes of staggering the terms of the council, each appointing authority shall appoint one (1) member to a term of four (4) years, one (1) member to a term of three (3) years, and one (1) member to a term of (2) years.

After the initial terms, the term of an appointed or reappointed member is four (4) years. However, the term of a reappointed member or a new appointee replacing an existing member begins on the day of the expiration of the prior term.

Notwithstanding subsection (e), at the end of the member's term, the member shall continue to serve until a replacement is appointed by the appropriate appointing authority.

Each member of the council must:

Be a citizen of the United States;

Be, and remain, a resident of this state; and

Possess and demonstrate honesty, integrity, and good character.

A person is not eligible for appointment to the council if the person:

Holds any elective office in state government;

Is an officer or official of any political party;

Has a direct pecuniary interest in the sports wagering or gaming industry;

Has been convicted of a felony;

Has been convicted of a misdemeanor involving gambling, theft, computer-related offenses, forgery, perjury, dishonesty, or unlawfully selling or providing a product or substance to a minor;

Has been convicted of any violation under this chapter; or

Has been convicted of any offense in a federal court, military court, or court of another state, territory, or jurisdiction that under the laws of this state would disqualify such person pursuant to subdivisions (g)(2)(D)–(F).

In making appointments to the council, the appointing authorities shall strive to ensure that the council membership is diverse in educational background, ethnicity, race, gender, and geographic residency and has experience in:

The sports industry;

Accounting; and

Law enforcement.

A vacancy on the council must be filled for the balance of the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment.

Five (5) members of the council constitute a quorum for the purposes of voting and conducting the business of the council.

The council shall elect a chair from among its membership. The chair shall serve in that capacity for one (1) year and is eligible for reelection. The chair shall preside at all meetings and shall have all the powers and privileges of other members.

The council shall meet not less than quarterly, and may hold additional regular and special meetings at the call of the board.

The members must be reimbursed for per diem and travel expenses in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The council shall:

Advise the board of best practices with respect to sports wagering;

Provide administrative and technical assistance to the corporation with respect to sports wagering; and

Carry out any other duties of the council as prescribed by the board or this part.

Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 7 provided that the act take effect July 1, 2019, the public welfare requiring it. The act was returned without the governor's signature and became effective under the provisions of Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

4-51-306. Powers and duties of corporation and board — Adoption of rules.

The corporation and board shall enforce this part and supervise compliance with laws and rules relating to the regulation and control of wagering on sporting events in this state.

The board shall promulgate rules in accordance with this part. Rules of the board promulgated under this part must be adopted, amended, or repealed in the same manner as the board adopts, amends, and repeals bylaws and regulations of the board for purposes of regulating the corporation's affairs and the conduct of corporate business.

Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 7 provided that the act take effect July 1, 2019, the public welfare requiring it. The act was returned without the governor's signature and became effective under the provisions of Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18.

4-51-307. Removal of member.

A member of the council may be removed from the council by the appointing authority if, in the opinion of the appointing authority, the member has committed misfeasance or malfeasance in office or neglect of duty.

Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 7 provided that the act take effect July 1, 2019, the public welfare requiring it. The act was returned without the governor's signature and became effective under the provisions of Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18.

4-51-308. Reports of board.

The board shall prepare and submit an annual report to the governor, the speaker of the senate, and the speaker of the house of representatives containing the following information:

The number of active licensees;

The aggregate gross and net revenue of all licensees; and

The financial impact on this state and local governments as the result of the sports wagering industry in this state.

The report prepared under subsection (a) must be submitted not later than September 30 of each year. A report submitted under subsection (a) may be submitted electronically.

Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 7 provided that the act take effect July 1, 2019, the public welfare requiring it. The act was returned without the governor's signature and became effective under the provisions of Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18.

4-51-309. Requirements for escrow account — Insurance — Cash-on-hand.

The board shall prescribe by rule:

The amount of a bond in escrow and the amount of cash that must be kept on hand to ensure that there exists adequate reserves to pay off bettors; and

Any insurance requirements for a licensee.

The licensee may maintain the bond at any bank lawfully operating in this state, and the licensee must be the beneficiary of any interest accrued thereon.

Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 7 provided that the act take effect July 1, 2019, the public welfare requiring it. The act was returned without the governor's signature and became effective under the provisions of Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18.

4-51-310. Financial practices — Audits of licensees — Post-employment restrictions.

The board shall prescribe by rule:

Minimum requirements by which each licensee must exercise effective control over its internal fiscal affairs, including, without limitation, requirements for:

Safeguarding assets and revenues, including evidence of indebtedness;

Maintenance of reliable records relating to accounts, transactions, profits and losses, operations, and events; and

Global risk management;

Requirements for internal and independent audits of licensees;

The manner in which periodic financial reports must be submitted to the board from each licensee, including the financial information to be included in the reports;

The type of information deemed to be confidential financial or proprietary information that is not subject to any reporting requirements under this part;

Policies, procedures, and processes designed to mitigate the risk of cheating and money laundering; and

Any post-employment restrictions necessary to maintain the integrity of sports wagering in this state.

Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 7 provided that the act take effect July 1, 2019, the public welfare requiring it. The act was returned without the governor's signature and became effective under the provisions of Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 507, July 1, 2019; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules and carrying out any administrative duties necessary to effectuate the provisions and intent of this act, the act took effect on May 25, 2019. See Compiler’s Notes.

4-51-311. Persons authorized to engage in sports wagering.

Except for those persons ineligible to place bets under § 4-51-312, a person who is twenty-one (21) years of age or older and who is physically located in this state may place a wager in the manner authorized by law.

A licensee shall ensure that all wagers accepted in this state are from qualified bettors and in accordance with this part.

Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 7 provided that the act take effect July 1, 2019, the public welfare requiring it. The act was returned without the governor's signature and became effective under the provisions of Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18.

4-51-312. Persons ineligible to place a bet or wager.

The following persons or categories of persons shall not, directly or indirectly, wager or bet on a sporting event in this state:

Any member, officer, or employee of the council, board, or corporation;

With respect to a licensee, any principal owner, partner, member of the board of directors, officer, or supervisory employee;

With respect to a vendor of a licensee, any principal owner, partner, member of the board of directors, officer, or supervisory employee;

Any contractor, subcontractor, or consultant, or officer or employee of a contractor, subcontractor, or consultant, of a licensee, if the person is directly involved in the licensee's operation of sports wagering or the processing of sports wagering claims or payments through the licensee's online sports wagering platform;

Any person subject to a contract with the board if the contract contains a provision prohibiting the person from participating in sports wagering;

Any person with access to information that is known exclusively to a person who is prohibited from placing a wager in this state under this section;

Any amateur or Olympic athlete if the wager is based on the sport or athletic event in which the athlete participates and that is overseen by the athlete's sports governing body;

Any professional athlete if the wager is based on any sport or athletic event overseen by the athlete's sports governing body;

Any owner or employee of a team, player, umpire or sports union personnel, or employee, referee, coach, or official of a sports governing body, if the wager is based on a sporting event overseen by the person's sports governing body;

Any trustee or regent of a governing board of a public or private institution of higher education;

Any member of an advisory board established under title 49, chapter 9, part 5;

Any person prohibited by the rules of a governing body of a collegiate sports team, league, or association from participating in sports wagering activities;

With respect to a student or an employee of a public or private institution of higher education, any person who has access to material nonpublic information concerning a student athlete or team, and the information is relevant to the outcome of a sporting event; provided, that the person is only prohibited from using the information to place a wager on a collegiate sporting event; and

Any person having the ability to directly affect the outcome of a sporting event.

The board may prescribe by rule additional categories of persons who are prohibited from placing a wager in this state.

The corporation shall maintain a confidential registry of persons and categories of persons who are ineligible to place a wager in this state and shall provide the registry to each licensee in this state. The corporation shall provide each updated registry to the licensees as soon as practicable. Each licensee shall maintain the registry provided by the corporation confidentially.

A violation of subsection (a) is:

For a first offense, a Class C misdemeanor;

For a second offense, a Class B misdemeanor; and

For a third or subsequent offense, a Class A misdemeanor.

As used in this section, “material nonpublic information” has the same meaning as defined in § 4-51-330(d).

Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 7 provided that the act take effect July 1, 2019, the public welfare requiring it. The act was returned without the governor's signature and became effective under the provisions of Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Penalties for Class A, B and C misdemeanors, §40-35-111.

4-51-313. Wagers as contracts.

Notwithstanding §29-19-101, each wager placed in accordance with this part is deemed to be an enforceable contract.

Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 7 provided that the act take effect July 1, 2019, the public welfare requiring it. The act was returned without the governor's signature and became effective under the provisions of Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18.

4-51-314. Wagers prohibited.

The board shall, by rule, prohibit wagering on:

Injuries, penalties, and other types or forms of wagering under this part that are contrary to public policy, unfair to consumers, or deemed to violate the Constitution of Tennessee, Article XI, § 5; and

Individual actions, events, statistics, occurrences, or nonoccurrences to be determined during a collegiate sporting event, including, without limitation, in-game proposition bets on the performance or non-performance of a team or individual participant during a collegiate sporting event.

A licensee may only offer parlay and proposition bets of the type or category as prescribed by rule of the board. The board shall prescribe by rule the types and categories of parlay and proposition bets that may be offered in this state, if any.

A licensee, professional sports team, league, or association, or institution of higher education may submit to the board in writing a request to prohibit a type or form of wagering, or to prohibit a category of persons from wagering, if the licensee, team, league, association, or institution believes that such wagering by type, form, or category is contrary to public policy, unfair to consumers, or affects the integrity of a particular sport or the sports betting industry.

The board shall, upon a demonstration of good cause from the requestor, grant the request. The board shall respond to a request pursuant to this subsection (b) concerning a particular event before the start of the event, or if it is not feasible to respond before the start of the event, as soon as practicable.

Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 7 provided that the act take effect July 1, 2019, the public welfare requiring it. The act was returned without the governor's signature and became effective under the provisions of Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18.

4-51-315. Integrity of sports wagering — Public interest.

The board, council, licensees, and vendors shall cooperate with investigations conducted by sports governing bodies and law enforcement agencies, including, but not limited to, providing or facilitating the provision of account-level betting information and data files relating to persons placing wagers.

Licensees shall immediately report to the board any information relating to:

Criminal or disciplinary proceedings commenced against the licensee in connection with its operations;

Abnormal betting activity or patterns that may indicate a concern with the integrity of a sporting event;

Any potential breach of a sports governing body's internal rules and codes of conduct pertaining to sports wagering;

Conduct that corrupts the betting outcome of a sporting event for purposes of financial gain, including match fixing; and

Suspicious or illegal wagering activities, including cheating, the use of funds derived from illegal activity, wagers to conceal or launder funds derived from illegal activity, using agents to place wagers, and using false identification.

Licensees shall also immediately report information relating to conduct described in subdivisions (b)(2)–(4) to the relevant sports governing body.

Licensees shall share with the board, in real time and at the account level, information regarding a bettor, amount and type of bet, the time the bet was placed, the location of the bet, including the internet protocol address if applicable, the outcome of the bet, and records of abnormal betting activity. Information shared under this subsection (d) must be submitted in the form and manner as required by rule of the board.

If a sports governing body has notified the board that real-time information sharing for wagers placed on its sporting events is necessary and desirable, licensees shall share the same information with the sports governing body or its designee with respect to wagers on its sporting events. Such information may be provided in anonymized form and may be used by a sports governing body solely for integrity purposes.

In addition to its specific rulemaking authority under this part, the board may promulgate rules it deems necessary to maintain the integrity of sports wagering in this state and to protect the public interest.

Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 7 provided that the act take effect July 1, 2019, the public welfare requiring it. The act was returned without the governor's signature and became effective under the provisions of Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18.

4-51-316. Official league data.

A licensee shall exclusively use official league data for purposes of live betting unless the licensee can demonstrate to the board that the governing body of a sport or sports league, organization, or association or other authorized entity cannot provide a feed of official league data for live betting in accordance with commercially reasonable terms, as determined by the board.

Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 7 provided that the act take effect July 1, 2019, the public welfare requiring it. The act was returned without the governor's signature and became effective under the provisions of Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18.

4-51-317. Applying for licenses — Fees.

An applicant for a license shall submit an application on a form, in such manner, and in accordance with such requirements as may be prescribed by rule of the board.

An application for a license must include the following:

The identification of the applicant's principal owners who own five percent (5%) or more of the company, partners, members of its board of directors, and officers;

A national criminal background check for each person identified under subdivision (b)(1) conducted by the Tennessee bureau of investigation or another appropriate law enforcement agency. A set of fingerprints must be supplied upon request and in the manner requested by the investigating agency;

Information, documentation, and assurances as may be required to establish by clear and convincing evidence the applicant's good character, honesty, and integrity. Such information may include, without limitation, information pertaining to family, habits, character, reputation, criminal and arrest records, business activities, financial affairs, and business, professional, and personal associates, covering at least the ten-year period immediately preceding the filing of the application;

Notice and a description of civil judgments obtained against the applicant pertaining to antitrust or security regulation laws of the federal government, of this state or of any other state, jurisdiction, province, or country;

Letters of reference from law enforcement agencies having jurisdiction in the applicant's place of residence and principal place of business. The letters of reference must indicate that such law enforcement agencies do not have any pertinent information concerning the applicant, or if such law enforcement agency does have information pertaining to the applicant, must specify what the information is;

If the applicant has conducted gaming operations in a jurisdiction which permits such activity, letters of reference from the regulatory body that regulates sports wagering that specify the standing of the applicant with the regulatory body; provided, however, that if no such letters are received within sixty (60) days of the request therefor, the applicant may submit a statement under oath that the applicant is or was, during the period such activities were conducted, in good standing with the governing body;

Information, documentation, and assurances concerning financial background and resources as may be required to establish by clear and convincing evidence the financial stability, integrity, and responsibility of the applicant, including, but not limited to, bank references, business and personal income and disbursement schedules, tax returns and other reports filed with governmental agencies, and business and personal accounting and check records and ledgers. Each applicant shall, in writing, authorize the examination of all bank accounts and records as may be deemed necessary by the board. The board may consider any relevant evidence of financial stability. The applicant is presumed to be financially stable if the applicant establishes by clear and convincing evidence that it meets each of the following standards:

The ability to assure the financial integrity of sports wagering operations by the maintenance of a bankroll or equivalent provisions adequate to pay winning wagers to bettors when due. An applicant is presumed to have met this standard if the applicant maintains, on a daily basis, a bankroll and equivalent provisions, in an amount which is at least equal to the average daily minimum bankroll or equivalent provisions, calculated on a monthly basis, for the corresponding month in the previous year;

The ability to meet ongoing operating expenses which are essential to the maintenance of continuous and stable sports wagering operations; and

The ability to pay, as and when due, all state and federal taxes;

Information, documentation, and assurances as may be required to establish by clear and convincing evidence that the applicant has sufficient business ability and gaming experience as to establish the likelihood of the creation and maintenance of a successful, efficient sports wagering operation;

Information, as required by rule of the board, regarding the financial standing of the applicant, including, without limitation, each person or entity that has provided loans or financing to the applicant;

A nonrefundable application fee in the amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), and an annual licensing fee in the amount of seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000); and

Any additional information required by the board by rule.

Upon review of the application, the board shall approve or deny an application for a license not more than ninety (90) days after receipt of an application.

A license issued by the board authorizes the licensee to offer interactive sports wagering in this state.

A licensee may renew its license by submitting an application on a form, in such manner, and in accordance with such requirements as may be prescribed by rule of the board. A licensee shall submit the nonrefundable annual license and application fees prescribed under subdivision (b)(10) with its application for the renewal of its license.

For each application for licensure or renewal of a license that is approved under this section, the amount of the application fee must be credited toward the licensee's annual license fee and the licensee shall remit the balance of the annual fee to the corporation upon approval of a license. The fees collected from licensees under this section must be used by the corporation to pay the actual operating and administrative expenses incurred under this part.

Except as provided in subsection (f), licensing and application fees collected by the board must be distributed to the state treasurer for deposit into the Tennessee Promise scholarship endowment fund created under § 49-4-708(d).

Each person holding a license under this part has a continuing duty to immediately inform the board of any change in status relating to any information that may disqualify the person from holding the license.

Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 7 provided that the act take effect July 1, 2019, the public welfare requiring it. The act was returned without the governor's signature and became effective under the provisions of Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18.

4-51-318. Restrictions on licensees.

A licensee shall not:

Allow a minor to place a wager;

Offer, accept, or extend credit to a bettor;

Directly advertise or promote sports wagering to minors. The board shall adopt rules specific to the manner in which a licensee may advertise its business operations as authorized by this part;

Offer or accept a wager on any event, outcome, or occurrence other than a sporting event, including, without limitation, a high school sporting event offered, sponsored, or played in connection with a public or private institution that offers education at the secondary level; or

Accept a wager from a person who is on the registry created and maintained by the corporation under § 4-51-312(c).

A violation of this section is:

For a first offense, a Class B misdemeanor; and

For a second or subsequent offense, a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 7 provided that the act take effect July 1, 2019, the public welfare requiring it. The act was returned without the governor's signature and became effective under the provisions of Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18.

Cross-References. Penalties for Class A and B misdemeanors, §40-35-111.

4-51-319. Responsible sports wagering.

Licensees shall allow bettors to restrict themselves from placing wagers with the licensee, including limits on the time spent betting and amounts wagered, and take reasonable steps to prevent those bettors from placing such wagers. At the request of a bettor, a licensee may share the request with the board for the sole purpose of disseminating the request to other licensees.

The board shall promulgate rules that require a licensee to implement responsible sports wagering programs that include comprehensive training on responding to circumstances in which individuals present signs of a gambling addiction.

The department of mental health and substance abuse services shall use the funds distributed to the department under § 4-51-304(e)(3) to oversee one (1) or more grant programs with organizations to provide treatment services for individuals with problem gambling or a gambling disorder, and to establish prevention initiatives to reduce the number of individuals with problem gambling or a gambling disorder. The department may also use the funds distributed to the department to cover its actual administrative costs and the costs of professional services associated with overseeing each grant program.

The department shall annually generate a report outlining the activities of the department with respect to funding received under this part for problem gambling and gambling disorders, including, but not limited to, descriptions of programs, therapies, grants, and other resources made available, the success and outcomes of utilizing such programs, therapies, grant programs, and resources, the number of persons treated, the number of persons who complete programs and therapies, and the rate of recidivism, if known. The department shall file the annual report with the governor, the speaker of the senate, and the speaker of the house of representatives, and shall publish the report on its website, no later than January 1 of each year. The annual report must include an itemization of the department's expenditures relating to administrative costs and professional services associated with its activities under this subsection (c).

Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 507, § 7 provided that the act take effect July 1, 2019, the public welfare requiring it. The act was returned without the governor's signature and became effective under the provisions of Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18.